Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.160

Annual assessment—Exemption—Brined sweet cherries assessable.

An annual assessment is hereby levied upon all commercial soft tree fruits grown in the state or packed as Washington soft tree fruit of fifty cents per two thousand pounds (net weight) of said fruits, when shipped fresh or delivered to processors, whether in bulk, loose in containers, or packaged in any style of package, except, that all sales of five hundred pounds or less of such fruits sold by the producer direct to the consumer shall be exempt from said assessments. Sweet cherries which are brined are deemed to be commercial soft tree fruit and therefore assessable hereunder.

[ 1989 c 354 s 28; 1963 c 51 s 3; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.160. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 18; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-27.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.